Maryland, session 2026, HB0843.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Tax – Property
14–813.
(a) (1) At any time after 30 days from the mailing of the statement and notice,
the collector shall cause to be published, 4 times, once a week for 4 successive weeks in 1
or more newspapers that have a general circulation in the county in which the property is
located, a notice that the property will, on the date and at the place named in the notice, be
sold at public auction.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *hb0843*

HOUSE BILL 843
(2) In Dorchester County, Frederick County, Garrett County, Kent County,
and Queen Anne’s County, the notice shall be published 3 times, once a week for 3
successive weeks.
(3) (i) In Baltimore City, the notice shall be:
1. published two times, once per week in alternate weeks;
and
2. posted on the City’s website 4 weeks prior to the sale.
(ii) The required newspaper notice shall include a statement that
notice shall be posted on the City’s website along with instructions on how the public can
access the website.
(4) (I) IN WASHINGTON COUNTY, THE NOTICE SHALL BE:
1. PUBLISHED TWO TIMES, ONCE PER WEEK IN
ALTERNATE WEEKS; AND
2. POSTED ON THE COUNTY’S WEBSITE 4 WEEKS PRIOR
TO THE SALE.
(II) 1. THE REQUIRED NEWSPAPER NOTICE SHALL INCLUDE
A STATEMENT THAT NOTICE SHALL BE POSTED ON THE COUNTY’S WEBSITE ALONG
WITH INSTRUCTIONS ON HOW THE PUBLIC CAN ACCESS THE WEBSITE.
2. THE NOTICE ON THE COUNTY’S WEBSITE SHALL BE
UPDATED BY THE CLOSE OF BUSINESS ON EACH FRIDAY UNTIL THE SALE.
14–817.1.
(a) Within 60 days after a property is sold at a tax sale, the collector shall send to
the person who last appears as owner of the property on the collector’s tax roll, at the last
address shown on the tax roll, a notice that includes:
(1) a statement that the property has been sold to satisfy unpaid taxes;
(2) the date of the tax sale;
(3) the amount of the highest bid;
(4) the lien amount on the property at the time of sale;

HOUSE BILL 843 3
(5) a statement that the owner has the right to redeem the property until
a court forecloses that right;
(6) a statement that the purchaser of the property may institute an action
to foreclose the property:
(i) as early as 6 months from the date of the sale; or
(ii) if a government agency certifies that the property requires, or
shall require, substantial repair to comply with applicable business codes, as early as 60
days from the date of the sale;
(7) a statement that if the property is redeemed before an action to
foreclose the right of redemption is filed, the amount that shall be paid to redeem the
property is:
(i) the total lien amount on the property at the time of sale, with
interest;
(ii) any taxes, interest, and penalties paid by the holder of the
certificate of sale; and
(iii) for property that is not owner–occupied residential property, any
delinquent taxes, interest, and penalties accruing after the date of the tax sale;
(8) a statement that, if the property is redeemed more than 4 months after
the date of the tax sale, and before an action to foreclose the right of redemption is filed,
the holder of the certificate of sale may be reimbursed for:
(i) attorney’s fees for recording the certificate of sale;
(ii) a title search fee, not to exceed $250; and
(iii) reasonable attorney’s fees, not to exceed $500;
(9) a statement that, if the property is redeemed after an action to foreclose
the right of redemption has been filed, the amount that shall be paid to redeem the property
is the sum of:
(i) the total lien amount on the property at the time of sale, with
interest;
(ii) any taxes, interest, and penalties paid by the holder of the
certificate of sale;
(iii) for property that is not owner–occupied residential property, any
delinquent taxes, interest, and penalties accruing after the date of the tax sale; and

HOUSE BILL 843
(iv) attorney’s fees and expenses to which the holder of the certificate
of sale may be entitled under § 14–843(a)(4) and (5) of this subtitle; and
(10) the provisions of § 14–843(a) of this subtitle, reproduced as they appear
in the Code.
(b) (1) The notice required under subsection (a) of this section shall be sent by
first–class mail.
(2) IN WASHINGTON COUNTY, ONE ADDITIONAL COPY OF THE NOTICE
REQUIRED UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION SHALL BE SENT WITHIN 15
DAYS AFTER THE NOTICE REQUIRED UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION.
(c) The mailing required under this section shall include a separate insert that
includes all of the information required under § 14–812(b) of this subtitle.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.